Utah statutes.
59-12-124.   Certified service provider liability.
(1)  Notwithstanding Section 59-12-107 and except as provided in Subsection
(2), if a model 1 seller selects a certified service provider as the model 1
seller's agent:
(a)  the certified service provider shall collect and remit an agreement sales
and use tax to the commission:
(i)  that the model 1 seller would otherwise be required to remit to the
commission under this chapter; and
(ii)  as provided in this chapter; and
(b)  the model 1 seller is not liable for the certified service provider's
failure to collect and remit an agreement sales and use tax to the commission
that the model 1 seller would otherwise be required to remit to the commission
under this chapter.
(2)  The model 1 seller described in Subsection (1):
(a)  shall remit to the commission a sales and use tax imposed by this
chapter:
(i)  on the model 1 seller's purchases; and
(ii)  as provided in this chapter; and
(b)  is liable for a sales and use tax liability arising from fraud by the
model 1 seller.
